Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,205
Material safety data sheet, defined.

Material safety data sheet means the sheet required to be developed under 29 C.F.R. 1910.1200(g).

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 15.